California statutes. Education Code
The endowment may apply for and accept federal grants. Notwithstanding Section 11005 of the Government Code, the endowment may receive gifts, donations, subventions, rents, royalties, and other financial support from public and private sources without additional approvals. Funds received pursuant to this section, except for federal grants, shall be deposited in the California Cultural and Historical Endowment Fund, which is hereby created, and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are continuously appropriated to the endowment for its lawful purposes, after notification to and approval by the Department of Finance. The endowment shall report annually to the Legislature on the condition and status of the fund, and the uses made of moneys in the fund during the year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Grants and Loans [20070. - 20074.]

20070.

(a) The endowment may award grants and loans on a competitive basis to public agencies and nonprofit organizations, including museums, to encourage development of a systematic and coordinated assemblage of buildings, sites, artifacts, museums, cultural landscapes, illustrations, written materials, and displays and interpretive centers to preserve and tell the stories of California as a unified society and of the many groups of people that together comprise historic and modern California. In addition to preserving and interpreting California’s missions, gold rush and pioneer sites, and other examples of early European exploration and settlement, the endowment shall give priority to funding projects to preserve, interpret, and enhance understanding and appreciation of the state’s subsequent cultural, social, and economic evolution. For example, it may fund projects involving buildings, including the acquisition of any interest in real property, structures, ships, historic cemeteries, site areas, places, trails, artifacts, artistic expressions, illustrations, written materials, or collections of artifacts, historic districts, cultural landscapes, illustrations, and written materials, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Projects that preserve, display, demonstrate, or interpret the contributions of the many unique identifiable ethnic and other communities that have added significant elements to California’s culture, including, but not limited to, their architecture, landscaping, urban forms, recreation, food and drink, styles, literature, artistic expressions, and pastimes.

(2) Projects that preserve and demonstrate culturally significant aspects of the changing ways that ordinary or particularly creative people lived their daily lives during the course of California history, including, but not limited to, representative or exceptionally expressive residences, recreational facilities and equipment, farms and ranches, transportation technologies, and innovative shopping arrangements.

(3) Projects that preserve, display, demonstrate, or interpret the industries, technologies, individuals, groups, and commercial enterprises that built California’s enormous economic strength, including, but not limited to, aircraft construction, banking and finance, electronics and related technologies, medical technologies, petroleum production and refining, movie and television production, and agriculture.

(4) Projects that preserve, display, demonstrate, or interpret California’s contribution to the national defense during the state’s history, including facilities and artifacts from closed military bases, and including projects about the social, demographic, and other changes that resulted from these national defense activities.

(5) Projects that preserve and promote understanding and continuity of California’s living cultural heritage and folklife that is deeply rooted in and reflective of its distinct cultural communities, including, but not limited to, public programs, recordings, exhibitions, apprenticeships, publications, ethnographic documentation, and archival preservation.

(6) Projects that preserve, display, demonstrate, or interpret California’s geologic and oceanographic history, including, but not limited to, its assemblage from Jurassic and earlier archipelagoes and ophiolitic remnants through subduction processes, and the expression of global tectonic forces in its mountains, basins, and faults.

(b) The endowment shall fund projects relating to the archaeology, history, or culture of California’s Native American population that are sensitive to the sovereign status of the tribes and that respect the cultural and spiritual traditions of those tribes.

(c) The endowment shall give priority to funding projects that preserve, document, interpret, or enhance understanding of threads of California’s story that are absent or underrepresented in existing historical parks, monuments, museums, and other facilities, and to achieve careful balance geographically, among communities and organizations of large and small size, and among diverse ethnic groups. The endowment may create financial and other incentives to support projects described in this subdivision, including, but not limited to, technical assistance, funding set asides, and preferential match requirements.

(d) The endowment shall ensure that California’s historic and cultural resources are accessible and available to the people of California, especially traditionally underserved communities, by encouraging programs including, but not limited to, traveling exhibitions, illustrative publications, exchanges, Web sites and digitalization of materials, and programs in conjunction with school districts to bring school children into contact with these materials, and may fund projects for these purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20071.

The endowment shall require that public agencies requesting a grant provide a matching amount of resources for the completion of the project. The match may include resources obtained from other funding agencies, and may include in-kind resources. The match shall be a proportion of the cost of the project as the endowment determines is appropriate, but the proportion shall be uniform for categories of project and public agencies, except pursuant to subdivision (c). The endowment shall determine the match proportion by considering the following:

(a) The endowment shall seek to leverage the resources available to it.

(b) The endowment shall require a match sufficient to ensure a strong commitment to the project on the part of the sponsoring agency.

(c) The endowment may require a lower than usual match if necessary to make projects realistic for underserved communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20072.

(a) The endowment shall require grant recipients to report on the progress and completion of any project for which they have received a grant, and on public acceptance or criticism of the project. The endowment shall make all such reports available to the Legislature.

(b) The endowment shall require grant recipients to follow the Secretary of the Interior’s Standards for the Treatment of Historic Properties where appropriate to ensure the historical integrity of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20073.

(a) Funds may be granted or loaned to a nonprofit organization under this chapter if the nonprofit organization enters into an agreement with the endowment, on such terms and conditions as the endowment specifies.

(b) (1) In the case of a grant for real property acquisition, the agreement shall provide all of the following:

(A) The purchase price of any interest in real property acquired by the nonprofit organization may not exceed the fair market value as established by an appraisal approved by the endowment.

(B) The endowment shall approve the terms under which the interest in land is acquired.

(C) The interest in land acquired pursuant to a grant from the endowment may not be used as security for any debt to be incurred by the nonprofit organization unless the endowment approves the transaction.

(D) The transfer of land acquired pursuant to an endowment grant shall be subject to the approval of the endowment and a new agreement sufficient to protect the interest of the people of California shall be entered into with the transferee.

(E) If any essential term or condition is violated, title to all interest in real property acquired with state funds shall immediately vest in the state.

(F) If the existence of the nonprofit organization is terminated for any reason, title to all interest in real property acquired with state funds shall immediately vest in the state unless another appropriate public agency or nonprofit organization is identified by the endowment and agrees to accept title to all interests in real property.

(2) Any deed or other instrument of conveyance whereby real property is being acquired by a nonprofit organization pursuant to this section shall set forth the reversionary interest of the state.

(c) The endowment shall also require an agreement sufficient to protect the public interest in any improvement or development constructed under a grant to a nonprofit organization for improvement and development of a project under this chapter. The agreement shall particularly describe any real property which is subject to the agreement, and it shall be recorded by the endowment in the county in which the real property is located.

(d) Any funds collected from a nonprofit organization pursuant to an agreement regarding a grant shall be deposited in the account created pursuant to Section 20060.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20074.

The endowment may provide technical and other assistance to applicants and prospective applicants as it determines to be useful or necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cultural and Historical Policy [20080. - 20080.]

20080.

The endowment shall undertake a comprehensive survey of the state of cultural and historical preservation, accessibility, and interpretation in California. In conducting the survey, the endowment shall coordinate with existing state agencies, including the California Arts Council and the Secretary of State. The report shall include all of the following:

(a) A survey of elements in California’s existing assemblage of buildings, sites, artifacts, museums, cultural landscapes, trails, illustrations, the arts and artistic expressions, written materials,
 and displays and interpretive centers that are missing or underrepresented, such as if current facilities, materials, and services leave out, misrepresent, or inadequately present some important thread of the story of California as a unified society or of the many groups of people that together comprise historic and modern California.

(b) Recommendations for steps that should be taken to fill in the missing or underrepresented elements identified in subdivision (a).

(c) Recommendations for the manner of transferring the Office of Historic Preservation in the Department of Parks and Recreation to the endowment, consistent with the Legislature’s intent expressed in Section 20052.5.

(d) Recommendations for additional steps that should be taken to better preserve and administer cultural and historic resources efficiently and effectively, including additional actions that should be taken to improve the governmental structures responsible for historic and cultural preservation in California, including oversight and support of museums. In particular, the endowment shall examine the feasibility and desirability of establishing the endowment as a separate institution in state government, without ties to any existing agency or department, although under the general authority of the Governor. The endowment shall also identify the most appropriate chair, or the most appropriate method for selecting the chair, of its board.

(e) A survey of the capacities and fiscal conditions of public, nonprofit, and other private
 entities in California that provide cultural and historical facilities and services, including museums.

(f) Recommendations for the future financing of cultural and historical programs provided by public agencies and nonprofit agencies in California, including museums.

(g) Recommendations for programs to encourage the historic maintenance and restoration of properties in private ownership, including, but not limited to, a state tax credit for restoration of historic properties that maintain historic integrity, property tax deferral as long as a property’s historic integrity is maintained, and low interest loans.

(h) A study of the economic impact of the preservation and interpretation of cultural and historic resources in the
 state. This should include the economic benefits resulting from the preservation of historic commercial and residential properties and sites, and from historic and cultural tourism activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 590, Sec. 2.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Museum and Cultural Resources Program [20090. - 20092.]

20090.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Museums help Californians understand the past, the present, and potential futures. Museums contribute to formal and informal learning at every stage of life, from the education of children in preschool to the continuing education of adults.

(b) Museums are considered a trusted source for information. Museums leverage this high level of public trust to help fight misinformation and promote understanding of critical issues.

(c) Museums are places for respite and support the well-being of Californians. Participation in museum experiences and programs can have measurable and positive impacts on children, seniors, and other vulnerable populations.

(d) Museums are an important means of making art, science, history, and culture available to
 Californians.

(e) Museums are caretakers and interpreters of the past and present. Providing a safe environment and proper care for collections for the public’s benefit is a responsibility of many museums.

(f) Museums capture, preserve, and share untold stories and prompt important public dialogue through exhibitions and education programs.

(g) Museums provide an economic boost to their communities
 by attracting tourists and local visitors, all of whom create a demand for services.

(h) Museums often help define the public identity of a community, and serve as a foundation of its cultural identity. A museum has the legacy of its community as the heart of its mission.

(i) Museums are vital partners with schools and teachers in sharing narratives about the state’s diverse racial and ethnic populations and understanding science.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.   (SB 963)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

20091.

To the extent that funding is available for such purposes, the endowment shall establish a competitive grant program to assist and enhance the services of museums in the state that undertake programs and projects that are deeply rooted in and reflective of underserved communities. This program shall give priority to those programs and projects doing any of the following:

(a) Serving pupils and teachers at schools eligible to be served under Part A of Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), as amended by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95).

(b) Serving children in low-income communities.

(c) Supporting museums in engaging or collaborating with underserved communities, including, but not limited to, people with disabilities and low-income families.

(d) Advancing preservation of at-risk cultural and natural collections and historic buildings. For purposes of this subdivision, “at-risk” refers to the potential for loss or deterioration due to forces, including, but not limited to, fires, harmful temperatures, humidity, earthquakes, improper handling, neglect, theft, vandalism, or exposure to water, pests, contaminants, light, or radiation.

(e) Improving access, including, but not limited to, accommodating the access needs of people with disabilities, to historic buildings, cultural sites, or museums.

(f) Supporting the ethical stewardship of culturally sensitive art and artifacts,
 including, but not limited to, engaging in consultations with California Indian tribes or repatriation.

(g) Educating the public about critical issues affecting Californians.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 27.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

20092.

(a) The endowment may create a competitive grant program to support capital projects, exhibits, educational programs, outreach programs, public programs, curriculum, publications, marketing, and collections care in museums pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 20057. The grant program shall give priority to the objectives listed in Section 20091.

(b) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development and adoption of program guidelines and selection criteria for purposes of this section. The endowment shall hold at least one public hearing before adopting program guidelines and selection criteria.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 300, Sec. 3.   (SB 963)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 12. FOUNDATIONS AND STATE COMMITTEES AND COMMISSIONS [21100. - 21203.]



  CHAPTER 1. Foundations, Trusts, and Institutions of Arts and Sciences [21100. - 21203.]



  ARTICLE 1. Foundations and Trusts [21100. - 21119.]

21100.

Any person desiring in his or her lifetime to promote the public welfare by founding, endowing, and maintaining within this state a university, college, school, seminary of learning, mechanical institute, museum, botanic garden, public park, or gallery of art, or any or all thereof, may, for such purposes, by grant in writing convey to a trustee, or any number of trustees, named in the grant, and to their successors, any property, real or personal, belonging to him or her and situated within this state. If he or she is married or in a registered domestic partnership and the property is community property, then both spouses shall join in the grant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 28.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

21101.

The grantor may designate in the grant:

(a) The nature, object, and purposes of the institution to be founded, endowed, and maintained.

(b) The name by which it shall be known.

(c) The powers and duties of the trustees, and the manner in which they shall account, and to whom, if accounting is required. Such powers and duties shall not be exclusive of other powers and duties which may be necessary to enable the trustees to fully carry out the objects of the grant.

(d) The mode and manner, and by whom, the successors to the trustee or trustees named in the grant are to be appointed.

(e) Such rules and regulations for the management of the property conveyed as the grantor may elect to prescribe. Such rules shall, unless the grantor otherwise prescribes, be deemed advisory only, and shall not preclude the trustees from making such changes as new conditions may from time to time require.

(f) The place where and the time when the buildings necessary and proper for the institution shall be erected, and the character and extent thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21102.

The grantor may also provide for all other things necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of the grant, and especially may provide for the trades and professions which shall be taught in the institution, and the terms upon which deserving scholars of the public and private schools of the various counties of this state may be admitted to all the privileges of the institution, as a reward for meritorious conduct and good scholarship.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21103.

The grantor may also provide for maintaining free scholarships for children of persons who have rendered service to or who have died in the service of the state and for maintaining free scholarships for children of mechanics, tradesmen, and laborers, who have died without leaving means sufficient to give their children a practical education, fitting them for the useful trades or arts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21104.

The grantor may also provide the terms and conditions upon which students in the public and private schools, and other deserving persons, may, without cost to themselves, attend the lectures of any university established, and also the terms and conditions upon which the museums, art galleries, and conservatories of music, connected with any such institution, shall be open to all deserving persons without charge, and without their becoming students of the institution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21105.

The trustee or trustees named in the grant, and their successors, may, in the name of the institution, as designated in the grant, sue and defend, in relation to the trust property, and in relation to all matters affecting the institution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21106.

The grantor, by a provision in the grant, may elect, in relation to the property conveyed, and in relation to the erection, maintenance, and management of the institution, to perform, during his life, all the duties and exercise all the powers which, by the terms of the grant, are enjoined upon and vested in the trustee or trustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21107.

A grantor who is a married person may further provide that his or her surviving spouse during his or her life, may, in relation to the property conveyed, and in relation to the election, maintenance, and management of the institution, perform all the duties and exercise all the powers which, by the terms of the grant, are enjoined upon and vested in the trustee and trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

21108.

In the cases referred to in Sections 21106 and 21107, the powers and duties conferred and imposed upon the trustee or trustees shall be exercised and performed by the grantor, or by his or her spouse, during his or her life, as the case may be. Upon the death of the grantor, or the surviving spouse, as the case may be, the powers and duties shall devolve upon and shall be exercised by the trustees named in the grant, and their successors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

21109.

The grantor may reserve the right to alter, amend, or modify the terms and conditions of the grant, and the trusts created, in respect to any of the matters mentioned or referred to in Sections 21101 to 21104, inclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21110.

The grantor may also reserve, during his or her life, the right of absolute dominion over the personal property conveyed, and also over the rents, issues, and profits of the real property conveyed, without liability to account therefor in any manner whatever, and without any liability over against his or her estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

21111.

A grantor who is a married person may further provide that his or her spouse, during his or her life, may have the same absolute dominion, over the personal property, and the rents, issues, and profits, without liability to account therefor in any manner whatever, and without liability over against the estate of either the grantor or his or her spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

21112.

The founder or founders, surviving founder, or spouse or surviving spouse of any founder, of a university, college, school, seminary of learning, mechanical institute, museum, gallery of art, library or any other institution, or any or all thereof, founded pursuant to this article, may, by an instrument in writing, resign, relinquish, and surrender all the rights, powers, privileges and duties reserved to or vesting in him or her, over, in, or concerning any of the property granted or given to the institution, or over or concerning the institution founded. Thereupon all estates, rights, powers, privileges, trusts, and duties which would otherwise vest in or devolve upon the trustee or trustees of the trusts and estates created upon the death of the person resigning, relinquishing, and surrendering, by the terms of the grant and amendments thereof, and by the terms of any grants, gifts, bequests, and devices supplementary thereto, or of any confirmatory grants, shall immediately vest in and devolve upon the trustee or trustees. Nothing herein contained shall prevent the person resigning, relinquishing and surrendering the rights, powers, privileges, or duties from thereafter becoming and serving as one of the trustees, or from becoming and serving as an officer of any board of trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

21113.

The grantor may provide in the grant that the trustees and their successors, may, in the name of the institution, become the custodian of the person of minors. When any such provision is made in a grant, the trustees and their successors may take the custody and control in the manner and for the time and in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21114.

The grant shall be executed, acknowledged, and recorded in the same manner as is provided by law for the execution, acknowledgment, and recording of grants of real property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21115.

No suit, action, or proceeding shall be commenced or maintained by any person to set aside, annul, or affect the conveyance, or to affect the title to the property conveyed, or the right to the possession, or to the rents, issues, and profits thereof, unless the action is commenced within two years after the date of filing the grant for record. No defense shall be made to any suit, action, or proceeding commenced by the trustee or trustees named in the grant, or their successors, privies, or persons holding under them, which involves the legality of the grant, or affects the title to the property conveyed, or the right to the possession, or the rents, issues, and profits thereof, unless the defense is made in a suit, action, or proceeding commenced within two years after the grant has been filed for record.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21116.

The property conveyed by the grant shall not, after a lapse of two years from the date of the filing for record of the grant, be subject to forced sale, under execution, or judicial proceedings of any kind, against the grantor or his privies, unless the action under which the execution is issued, or the proceedings under which the sale is ordered, has been commenced within two years after the grant has been filed for record. No property shall be subject to execution or forced sale under any judgment obtained in any proceedings instituted within two years, if there is other property of the grantor, subject to execution or forced sale sufficient to satisfy the judgment. Nothing in this section contained shall be construed to affect mechanics’ or laborers’ liens.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21117.

Any person making the grant may, at any time thereafter, by last will or testament, devise and bequeath to the state all or any of the property, real and personal, mentioned in the grant, or in any supplemental grant, and the devise or bequest shall only take effect if, from any cause whatever, the grant is annulled or set aside, or the trusts therein declared for any reason fail. Such devise and bequest is permitted to be made by way of assurance that the wishes of the grantor shall be carried out, and in the faith that the state, if it succeeds to the property, or any part thereof, will, to the extent and value of the property, carry out, in respect to the objects and purposes of the grant, all the wishes and intentions of the grantor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21118.

No wish, direction, act, or condition expressed, made, or given by any grantor, under this article, as to religious instruction to be given in any school, college, seminary, mechanical institute, museum, or gallery of art, or in respect to the exercise of religious belief, on the part of any pupil of the school or institution of learning, shall be binding upon the state. The state shall not enforce, or permit to be enforced or carried out, any such wish, direction, act, or condition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21119.

The provisions of this article shall be liberally construed with a view to effect its objects and promote its purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Institutions of Arts and Sciences [21140. - 21154.]

21140.

Any person intending in his lifetime or by will or trust deed, to operate after his death, to found, maintain, and perpetuate in this state a public library, museum, gallery of art, or any or all thereof, for the diffusion of mechanical, scientific, artistic, and general knowledge, may for that purpose, convey in writing by words denoting a gift or grant to one or more trustees named in the gift or grant, and to their successors, any library or collection of books and works, for the public library, or any museum, or gallery of art in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21141.

The gift or grant may also express and shall be construed to be a conveyance of the future additions and accretions thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21142.

The grantor may also in like manner, convey by grant to the trustee or trustees any real property within this state belonging to him, which may be necessary or proper for the erection and maintenance of buildings suitable to the institution, and the buildings erected thereon, with grounds, conveniently adjacent thereto, and other lands, tenements, and hereditaments for the purpose of producing an income for the support and maintenance of the institutions and any collateral burdens which may be imposed by the terms of the foundation as part and parcel of the regulations for its conduct, and also personal property of all descriptions, which may subserve the purposes of the institution and maintenance of the library, museum, or gallery of art.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21143.

Any contributions or gifts by any other person than the founder, of any property suitable to the general plan or support of any institution mentioned in this article, shall immediately vest in the trustees, and become incorporated into and subject to the trust, and to all its terms and conditions, and be managed under the rules and regulations prescribed therefor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21144.

The person making the gift, grant, or conveyance, as founder may therein designate:

(a) The name by which the institution shall be known.

(b) Its nature, object, and purposes.

(c) The powers and duties of the trustees, which shall not be exclusive of other powers and duties that, in their judgment, may be necessary more effectually to carry out the purposes of the institution.

(d) The mode, manner, and by whom the successors to the trustees named in the gift or grant shall be appointed.

(e) Such rules and regulations for the management of the institution, and the furtherance of its purposes, as the grantor may elect to prescribe. Such rules and regulations shall, unless the grant shall otherwise prescribe, be deemed advisory only, and shall not preclude the trustees or their successors from making such changes as new conditions may, from time to time, require.

(f) The place or places where the necessary buildings shall be erected, and the general character thereof. The grantor may provide in the grant for all other things necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of the grant, or otherwise, by his last will or testament.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21145.

The trustees named in the gift or grant, and their successors, may, in the name of the institution, sue and defend in relation to the trust property, and to all matters affecting the institution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21146.

By a provision in the gift or grant, the founder may elect, in respect to the personal and real property conveyed, and the additions and increase thereof, and in respect to the erection, maintenance, and management of any buildings auxiliary thereto, and in respect to any property connected with the institution, to reserve to himself a veto and right of annulment or modification of any act of the trustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21147.

If he elects to veto, annul, or modify any act of the trustees, he shall, within 30 days after notice of the performance of the act, file in the office of the trustees, or deliver to their president or principal officer, a notice in writing, of the veto, annulment, or modification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21148.

Upon a like notice, in conformity with a provision in the gift or grant, he may elect to perform during his life all the powers which, by the terms of the grant, are vested in or enjoined upon the trustees, and their successors. Upon the death or disability to act of the founder and grantor, the powers and duties shall devolve upon, and be exercised by, the trustees, and their successors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21149.

The founder may also reserve the right to alter, amend, or modify, at any time during his life, or by his last will and testament, the terms and conditions of the grant, and the trust created in respect to the institution, its buildings, and the property conveyed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21150.

The founder may in the deed of trust name and describe the character and personality of any one or more of the immediate or future trustees, the librarian, and other officers, and name and impose any particular duty to be performed by any one or more trustees or other officers so described and characterized. He may declare and limit any compensation, and fix the character and method of the compensation he chooses to provide for the trustee or other officer whom the terms of his foundation may characterize, and upon whom specific or general duties are imposed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21151.

The gift or grant shall be executed, acknowledged, and recorded in the manner provided by law for the execution, acknowledgment, and recording of grants of real property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21152.

No suit, action, or proceeding shall be commenced or maintained by any person to set aside, annul, or affect any gift, grant, or conveyance, or to affect the title to the property conveyed, or the right to the possession or to the rents, issues, and profits thereof, unless the action is commenced within two years after the date of the filing of the grant for record.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21153.

Any founder, making a gift or grant for any of the purposes mentioned in this article, may, at any time thereafter, by last will or testament, devise or bequeath to the state all or any of the property, real and personal, mentioned in the gift or grant, or in any supplemental grant or gift, and the devise or bequest shall take effect if, from any cause whatever, the gift or grant is annulled or set aside, or the trusts therein declared for any reason fail. Such devise or bequest is suffered to be made by way of assurance that the intentions of the grantor shall be carried out, and in the faith that the state, if it succeeds to the property, or any part thereof, will, to the extent and value of the property carry out, in respect to the objects and purposes of the grant, all the wishes and intentions of the grantor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21154.

The provisions of this article shall be liberally construed, with a view to effect its objects and purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Legal Validation Proceedings [21180. - 21203.]

21180.

The trustee or trustees of any trust or trusts created for the founding, endowment, and maintenance of a university, college, school, seminary of learning, mechanical institute, museum, gallery of art, library, or any other institution, or any or all thereof, pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 21100) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 21140) of this chapter, may commence a special proceeding to determine all questions of law and fact affecting the existence of, and the due and voluntary execution and delivery, and the terms, validity, and legal effect of the grant founding the institution, and of all amendments or attempted amendments to the grant, and of any supplemental grants or gifts, and of any confirmatory conveyances, of the founder or surviving founder, or spouse or surviving spouse of the founder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

21181.
